Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 31
LEWIS-CLARK STATE COLLEGE

Section.

33-3101. Establishment of school.

An institute of higher education for the state of Idaho is hereby established in the city of Lewiston, in the county of Nez Perce, to be called the Lewis-Clark State College, heretofore called the Lewis-Clark Normal School, the purposes of which shall be the offering and the giving of instruction in college courses in the sciences, arts and literature, professional, technical, and courses or programs of higher education as are usually included in colleges and universities leading to the granting of appropriate collegiate degrees as approved by the state board of education.

33-3102. Board of trustees.

The Lewis-Clark State College is hereby declared to be a body politic and corporate, with its own seal and having power to sue and be sued in its own name. The general supervision, government and control of the Lewis-Clark State College is vested in the state board of education, which shall act as the board of trustees of the Lewis-Clark State College.

33-3103. Meetings, officers, and proceedings of board.

The said board of trustees may conduct its proceeding in such manner as will best conduce to the proper dispatch of business. A majority of the board of trustees shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, but a less number may adjourn from time to time[.] No member of said board of trustees shall participate in any proceeding in which he has any pecuniary interest. Every vote and official act of the said board of trustees shall be entered of record. No vacancy in the board of trustees shall impair the right of the remaining trustees to exercise all the powers of the said board of trustees. At their first meeting, and annually thereafter, the said board of trustees shall elect from their number a chairman, a vice-chairman and a secretary. The state treasurer shall be treasurer of said board of trustees. It shall be the duty of the secretary to keep an accurate and detailed account of the doings of the board.

33-3104. General powers and duties of board.

All rights and title to property, real or personal, belonging to or vested in the Lewis-Clark State College are hereby vested in its board of trustees and their successors. The board of trustees is empowered to acquire, by purchase or exchange, any property which in the judgment of the board is needful for the operation of the Lewis-Clark State College; and to dispose of, by sale or exchange, any property which in the judgment of the board is not needful for the operation of the college.

The board of trustees of the Lewis-Clark State College shall have the following powers:

To adopt rules and regulations for its own government and for that of the college.

To accept grants or gifts of money, materials or property of any kind from any governmental agency, or from any person, firm or association, on such terms as may be determined by the grantor.

To cooperate with any governmental agency, or any person, firm or association in the conduct of any educational program, to accept grants or gifts from any source for the conduct of such program; and to conduct such program on or off campus.

To employ architects or engineers in planning the construction, remodeling or repair of any building or property, and whenever no other agency is designated by law to do so, to let contracts for such construction, remodeling or repair and to supervise the work thereof.

To have at all times, general supervision and control of all property, real or personal, appertaining to the college, and to insure the same.

33-3105. Control of funds

Disbursements. [Repealed.]

33-3106. President and other teachers, officers, and employees — Salaries and duties — Removal.

The board of trustees shall have power to employ a president of the college and, with his advice, to appoint such assistants, deans, instructors, specialists and other employees as are required for the operation of the college; to fix salaries and to prescribe duties and to remove the president or other employees in accordance with the policies and rules of the state board of education.

33-3107. Course of study, certificates, and diplomas.

It shall be the duty of the board of trustees, with the advice of the president, to prescribe the courses and programs of study, the requirements for admission, the time and standard for graduation, and to grant academic degrees to those students entitled thereto.

33-3108 — 33-3112. Textbooks — Admission of students — Courses of instruction. [Repealed.]

33-3113. Sectarian tests prohibited.

No religious or sectarian test shall be applied in the admission of students, nor in the selection of instructors or other personnel of the college.

33-3114. Transfer and control of funds. — All of the funds and money in the dormitory fund and dining fund, including any revolving fund, of the Lewis-Clark Normal School, as the same is authorized by sections 33-3701

33-3711, Idaho Code, and all of the unexpended funds hereto allocated and appropriated to the Lewis-Clark Normal School for the purposes specified therein, and all of the educational or other endowment funds, holdings, rights, privileges and immunities of the Lewiston Normal School, the Northern Idaho College of Education, and the Lewis-Clark Normal School, and any allocations or appropriations from the normal school [income] fund, as provided by section 33-3302, Idaho Code, are hereby transferred to, vested in and continued in the Lewis-Clark State College and placed under the control of its board of trustees, and appropriated for expenditure by it and shall be paid out by the state treasurer in the manner provided by the constitution and laws of the state of Idaho. All of the property, real and personal, and all of the obligations, legal and moral, of the Lewiston Normal School, the Northern Idaho College of Education, and of the Lewis-Clark Normal School, are hereby vested in, or shall become the obligations of, the Lewis-Clark State College.

33-3115. Transfer of property. [Repealed.]

33-3116. Construction of references to Lewiston State Normal School.

Wherever the name Lewiston Normal School, or Northern Idaho College of Education, or Lewis-Clark Normal School, shall appear in any statute, such statute is hereby amended to read Lewis-Clark State College as fully and completely as though the said name on said statute was specifically amended therein, and all such statutes shall be construed to refer to and mean Lewis-Clark State College.

33-3117, 33-3118. Construction of references to Northern Idaho College of Education — Separability. [Repealed.]